District of Columbia statutes.
26-1020

Hearings and procedures.

The provisions of subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 shall apply to any hearing afforded pursuant to this chapter.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-140, § 21, 47 DCR 3431